Utah statutes.
63B-1-305.   Powers and duties of authority.
(1)  The authority shall have perpetual succession as a body politic and
corporate.
(2)  The authority may:
(a)  sue and to be sued in its own name;
(b)  have, and alter at will, an official seal;
(c)  contract with experts, advisers, consultants, and agents for needed
services;
(d)  with the prior approval of the Legislature, borrow money and issue
obligations, including refunding obligations;
(e)  receive and accept aid or contributions from any source, including the
United States or this state, in the form of money, property, labor, or other
things of value to be held, used and applied to carry out the purposes of this
part, subject to the conditions upon which this aid and contributions are
made, for any purpose consistent with this part;
(f)  enter into agreements with any department, agency or instrumentality of
the United States or this state, financial institutions, or contractors for
the purpose of leasing, maintaining, and operating any facility;
(g)  to the extent permitted under its contract with the holders of its
obligations, consent to any modification relating to rate of interest, time
and payment of any installment of principal or interest, security or any other
term of any contract, mortgage, mortgage loan, mortgage loan commitment,
contract or agreement of any kind to which it is a party;
(h)  pledge revenues from any facility to secure the payment of obligations
relating to that facility, including interest on obligations, and to redeem
those obligations;
(i)  cause to be executed mortgages, trust deeds, indentures, pledge
agreements, assignments, security agreements, and financing statements
encumbering property acquired, or constructed under this part;
(j)  own, lease, operate, and encumber facilities acquired or constructed
under this chapter by it or the division;
(k)  exercise the power of eminent domain;
(l)  rent or lease any facility in whole or in part to any state body; and
(m)  have and exercise any other powers or duties that are necessary or
appropriate to carry out and effectuate the purposes of this part.
